Washington statutes.
RCW 35.81.115

General obligation bonds authorized.

For the purposes of this chapter a municipality may (in addition to any authority to issue bonds pursuant to RCW 35.81.100) issue and sell its general obligation bonds. Any bonds issued by a municipality pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of bonds by such municipality for public purposes generally.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.81.115. Prior: 1959 c 79 s 1.]